Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.470

Referral for enforcement.

As appropriate, an ethics board may refer a complaint:

(1) To an agency for initial investigation and proposed resolution which shall be referred back to the appropriate ethics board for action; or

(2) To the attorney general's office or prosecutor for appropriate action.

[ 1994 c 154 s 217.]